Utah statutes.
63A-14-303.   General powers -- Jurisdiction.

(1)  The commission has jurisdiction only over an individual who is currently serving as an executive branch elected official.

(2)  The commission or the chair shall dismiss an ethics complaint if:

(a)  the respondent resigns from the respondent's position as an executive branch elected official; or

(b)  the House of Representatives convenes to consider impeachment of the executive branch elected official.

(3) (a)  The commission may suspend commission proceedings during a period of time when a criminal investigation or prosecution, based in whole or in part on an allegation in the complaint, is pending.

(b)  The time periods and deadlines described in this chapter are tolled during a suspension described in Subsection (3)(a).

(4)  The commission does not have jurisdiction over a violation that occurs before March 14, 2013.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

